District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2803

Revocation of theater license for failure to comply with public decency regulations.

Repealed.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 623, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 3
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 551, ch. 366
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254,§ 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 101(c), 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2803.
1973 Ed., § 47-2303.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 12-103, § 12 ( 45 DCR 1660), eff. May 8, 1998, provided for the temporary amendment of this section subsequent to its repeal by D.C. Law 12-86. Section 16(b) of D.C. Law 12-103 provided for expiration “after 225 days of its having taken effect.”

D.C. Law 12-210, § 11(b) ( 45 DCR 8459), eff. April 13, 1999, provided for the temporary amendment of § 47-2801 without reference to its repeal by D.C. Law 12-86. Section 15(b) of D.C. Law 12-210 provided for expiration “after 225 days of its having taken effect.”

D.C. Law 12-261, title II, § 2003(pp)(6) ( 46 DCR 3142), eff. April 20, 1999, amends § 47-2805 without reference to its prior repeal by D.C. Law 12-86.